Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.160

Assistive devices and services—Interagency cooperative agreements—Definitions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of children, youth, and families, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the Washington state school for the blind, school districts, educational service districts, and all other state and local government educational agencies and the department of services for the blind, the department of social and health services, and all other state and local government agencies concerned with the care, education, or habilitation or rehabilitation of children with disabilities may enter into interagency cooperative agreements for the purpose of providing assistive technology devices and services to children with disabilities. Such arrangements may include but are not limited to interagency agreements for the acquisition, including joint funding, maintenance, loan, sale, lease, or transfer of assistive technology devices and for the provision of assistive technology services including but not limited to assistive technology assessments and training.

For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any service that directly assists a child with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device. Assistive technology service includes:

(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability, including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary environment;

(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;

(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying, retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;

(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;

(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability or if appropriate, the child's family; and

(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers, or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise substantially involved in the major life functions of children with disabilities.

[ 2019 c 266 s 14; 2018 c 58 s 32; 2009 c 381 s 24; 2007 c 115 s 15; 1997 c 104 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 381: See note following RCW 72.40.015.